Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.020

Membership—Terms.

The commission shall consist of eleven members. One member shall be a judge selected by and from the court of appeals judges; one member shall be a judge selected by and from the superior court judges; one member shall be a judge selected by and from the limited jurisdiction court judges; two members shall be selected by the state bar association and be admitted to the practice of law in this state; and six members shall be nonlawyers appointed by the governor. The term of each member of the commission shall be four years.

[ 2005 c 15 s 1; 1989 c 367 s 2; 1987 c 186 s 2; 1981 c 268 s 3.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2005 c 15: "This act takes effect January 1, 2006, if the proposed amendment to Article IV, section 31 of the state Constitution (Senate Joint Resolution No. 8207, changing the membership of the commission on judicial conduct) is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety." [ 2005 c 15 s 2.] Senate Joint Resolution No. 8207 was approved and ratified by the voters at the November 8, 2005, general election.

Contingent effective date—1989 c 367: See note following RCW 2.64.010.

Terms of additional members—1987 c 186 s 2: "Notwithstanding RCW 2.64.020, the initial term of one of the members added to the commission on judicial conduct by section 2, chapter 186, Laws of 1987 shall end on June 16, 1990, and the term of the other member shall end on June 16, 1991, as determined by lot." [ 1987 c 186 s 3.]